Utah, session 2026, SB154.
Section 1. Section 26B-6-901 is enacted to read:9. Utah Protection and Advocacy Agency26B-6-901. Definitions.As used in this part:(1)"Appropriate for the need of the individual" means the services, treatment, and medications recommended by the disabled individual's physical health or mental health provider.(2)"Disabled individual" means a person with a disability, as defined in the Americans with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. Sec.12102.(3)"State protection and advocacy agency" means an entity designated by the governor as the protection and advocacy agency for disabled individuals in this state.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 26B-6-902 is enacted to read:26B-6-902. State protection and advocacy agency.(1)The state protection and advocacy agency should:(a)represent and advocate for the interests of all disabled individuals in the state;(b)annually hold at least three meetings with the public throughout the state to:(i)understand the needs in the local community; and(ii)provide education, advocacy, and resources to disabled individuals in the local community; and(c)provide a written report annually to the Judiciary Interim Committee and Health and Human Services Interim Committee on or before August 31.(2)The report described in Subsection (1)(c) may include:(a)the number and location of public meetings;(b)the number and description of the types of services and advocacy provided, including the number and description of advocacy incidents that:(i)advocated for a more-integrated or less-integrated setting or care, according to the appropriate need of the individual;(ii)advocated for a greater level or lesser level of treatment, including medication treatment, according to the appropriate need of the individual; and(iii)advocated for a deviation from a treatment provider recommendation and the reason;(c)a list of the government entities that the state protection and advocacy agency worked with;(d)the number of individuals served that:(i)are not capable of living independently;(ii)can live somewhat independently, with formal supports;(iii)live independently; and(iv)are a family member of a disabled individual;(e)the number of individuals that the state protection and advocacy agency:(i)referred to and received voluntary treatment;(ii)petitioned for and were ordered into involuntary treatment;(iii)exited from homelessness into a residential or clinical setting;(iv)was able to advocate for assisted outpatient treatment or assertive community treatment that resulted in placement or acquisition of supportive housing; and(v)advocated for with the goal of discontinuing any aspect of services or treatment deemed to be appropriate for the need of the individual; and(f)policy recommendations, if any.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.